Utah statutes.
34A-2-405.   Employee injured outside state -- Entitled to compensation -- Limitation of time.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), if an employee who has been hired or is regularly employed in this state receives personal injury by accident arising out of and in the course of employment outside of this state, the employee, or the employee's dependents in case of the employee's death, shall be entitled to compensation according to the law of this state.

(2)  This section applies only to those injuries received by the employee within six months after leaving this state, unless prior to the expiration of the six-month period the employer has filed with the division notice that the employer has elected to extend such coverage a greater period of time.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 375, 1997 General Session

